Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB186.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Abrogation of CO2 Budget Trading Program Regulations Act.Section 2. Abrogation of regulations.The provisions of 25 Pa. Code Ch. 145 Subch. E (relating to CO2 Budget Trading Program) are abrogated.Section 3. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.123456789101112